Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.180

Employment of X-ray technicians—Rules.

(1) A chiropractor may employ a technician to operate X-ray equipment after the technician has registered with the commission.

(2) The commission may adopt rules necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 117; 1991 c 222 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 222: See RCW 18.84.903.